North Carolina, session 2025, HB223.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article XI of the Charter of Mooresville, being Chapter 239 of the
Session Laws of 1975, as amended, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 11.4. Conveyance of property. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
Board of Commissioners may, with or without consideration, and upon such terms as it deems
wise, convey real property owned by the Town for one or more of the following purposes: (i)
affordable housing for low- and moderate-income persons, (ii) housing for veterans, and (iii)
housing for emergency responders; provided, however, no real property acquired by the exercise
of eminent domain may be conveyed under this section. The deed conveying the real property
may contain a restriction which provides that the real property shall revert to the Town if it ceases
to be used for increasing the supply of housing, as authorized in this section, prior to the
expiration of the time period established by the Board of Commissioners. Any conveyance of
real property under this section may be made only pursuant to a resolution adopted by the Board
of Commissioners at a regular or special meeting authorizing a municipal official designated by
the Board of Commissioners in accordance with this Charter or general or local law to make the
conveyance for one or more of the purposes authorized in this section. The resolution shall be
posted on the Town's website at least 10 calendar days prior to the date the conveyance is
executed by the municipal official.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Emergency responder. – A firefighter, law enforcement officer, paramedic,
emergency medical technician, or other individual, including an employee of
a legally organized and recognized volunteer organization, whether
compensated or not, who, in the course of his or her professional duties,
responds to fire, medical, hazardous material, or other similar emergencies.
(2) Veteran. – A person who served as a member of the United States Armed
Forces in active duty, as defined by 38 U.S.C. § 101, and who was either
separated from the United States Armed Forces under honorable conditions or
who is currently serving in a second or subsequent enlistment. The term also
means a person who was separated from the United States Armed Forces
*H223-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
under honorable conditions with a disability that was incurred (i) as a direct
result of armed conflict or (ii) while the person was engaged in
extra-hazardous service, including service under conditions simulating war."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 223-First Edition